Washington statutes.
RCW 41.05.180

Mammograms—Insurance coverage.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

Each health plan offered to public employees and their covered dependents under this chapter that is not subject to the provisions of Title 48 RCW and is established or renewed after January 1, 1990, and that provides benefits for hospital or medical care shall provide benefits for screening or diagnostic mammography services, provided that such services are delivered upon the recommendation of the patient's physician or *advanced registered nurse practitioner as authorized by the **nursing care quality assurance commission pursuant to chapter 18.79 RCW or physician assistant pursuant to chapter 18.71A RCW.

This section shall not be construed to prevent the application of standard health plan provisions applicable to other benefits such as deductible or copayment provisions. This section does not limit the authority of the state health care authority to negotiate rates and contract with specific providers for the delivery of mammography services. This section shall not apply to medicare supplement policies or supplemental contracts covering a specified disease or other limited benefits.

[1994 sp.s. c 9 s 725; 1989 c 338 s 5.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: *(1) The term "advanced registered nurse practitioner" was changed to "advanced practice registered nurse" by 2024 c 239 s 1, effective June 30, 2027.

**(2) The reference to "nursing care quality assurance commission" was changed to "board of nursing" by 2023 c 123.

Severability—Headings and captions not law—Effective date—1994 sp.s. c 9: See RCW 18.79.900 through 18.79.902.